Nevada, session 83, SB252.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388D of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 26, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Nevada Education Savings Account
Program is hereby established.
2. Sections 2 to 26, inclusive, of this act, may be cited as the
Nevada Education Savings Account Program Act.
Sec. 3. As used in sections 2 to 26, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 4 to 11, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 4. “Account-granting organization” means a private,
nonprofit organization that is certified by the Department
pursuant to section 12 or 21 of this act.
Sec. 5. “Child” means a resident of this State who is eligible
to enroll in a public elementary or secondary school.
Sec. 6. “Department” means the Department of Education.
Sec. 7. “Education savings account” means an account
established for a child by an account-granting organization
pursuant to section 16 of this act.
Sec. 8. “Education service provider” means a person or
organization that is approved by an account-granting organization
pursuant to section 18 of this act to receive money from an
education savings account for an expense that is authorized
pursuant to section 19 of this act.
Sec. 9. “Parent” means the parent, custodial parent, legal
guardian or other person in this State who has control or charge
of a child and the legal right to direct the education of the child.
Sec. 10. “Private school” means a nonprofit private
elementary or secondary educational institution that is licensed in
this State.
Sec. 11. “Program” means the Nevada Education Savings
Account Program established by section 2 of this act.
Sec. 12. 1. An account-granting organization must apply to
the Department to participate in the Program. An application must
include, without limitation:
(a) A copy of the documents indicating that the account-
granting organization has incorporated in this State as a nonprofit
organization;
(b) A copy of the determination by the Internal Revenue
Service that the account-granting organization is exempt from
-
*SB252*

– 4 –
taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3);
(c) A description of the methodology that the account-granting
organization will use to evaluate whether a child is eligible for an
education savings account;
(d) A description of the application process that the account-
granting organization will use for parents applying for an
education savings account;
(e) A description of how the account-granting organization
will approve education service providers to receive money from an
education savings account;
(f) A description of the process that the account-granting
organization will use to inform parents of approved education
service providers;
(g) The process and procedures that will be used by the
account-granting organization for crediting refunds from an
education service provider back to an education savings account;
and
(h) An acknowledgment that the account-granting
organization is prohibited from discriminating against a parent or
child on the basis of race, color, ethnicity or national origin in
approving or denying any application for an education savings
account.
2. To obtain approval and certification from the Department,
an account-granting organization must:
(a) Be exempt from taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3);
(b) Not own or operate any school in this State, including,
without limitation, a private school; and
(c) Meet any other requirement established by regulation of
the Department.
3. The Department shall process an application for
certification within 60 days after receipt.
4. If certified by the Department, an account-granting
organization shall:
(a) Solicit and accept donations from taxpayers pursuant to
sections 28 and 30 of this act;
(b) Not expend more than 10 percent of the total amount of
money accepted pursuant to paragraph (a) to pay its
administrative expenses; and
(c) Provide grants to education savings accounts on behalf of
children whose parents enter into an agreement with the account-
granting organization pursuant to section 16 of this act.
Sec. 13. 1. Each account-granting organization:
-
*SB252*

– 5 –
(a) Shall implement a commercially viable, cost-effective and
user-friendly system for administering education savings
accounts; and
(b) May contract with a private financial institution for the
administration of education savings accounts.
2. An account-granting organization:
(a) Shall not implement a system that requires parents to be
reimbursed for expenses; and
(b) May implement a system that provides for the preapproval
of a particular expense to be reimbursed from an education
savings account.
Sec. 14. 1. An account-granting organization shall ensure
that at least 90 percent of the money received pursuant to sections
28 and 30 of this act is allocated to education savings accounts.
2. An account-granting organization may, after notifying the
Department, transfer revenue received pursuant to section 28 or
30 of this act to any other account-granting organization for
allocation to education savings accounts.
Sec. 15. 1. Each account-granting organization shall:
(a) Create a standard application process that is publicly
available on the Internet website of the account-granting
organization for parents to apply for an education savings account
pursuant to section 16 of this act; and
(b) Provide each parent whose application for an education
savings account is approved a written explanation of:
(1) The responsibilities of the parent resulting from the
creation of an education savings account;
(2) The duties of the account-granting organization;
(3) The role of any private financial institution with which
the account-granting organization is contracted to administer
education savings accounts; and
(4) The education service providers who are eligible to
receive payment out of the education savings account for an
expense that is authorized pursuant to section 19 of this act.
2. If a parent of a child with a disability applies to receive an
education savings account, the account-granting organization
must notify the parent:
(a) That receiving an education savings account is a parental
placement pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1412; and
(b) Of the rights that the child has pursuant to 20 U.S.C. §
1412 and any applicable state law.
Sec. 16. 1. The parent of any child required to enroll in
and attend a public school pursuant to NRS 392.040 may apply to
an account-granting organization for an education savings
account. To the extent that money is available to make a grant
-
*SB252*

– 6 –
pursuant to section 17 of this act, the account-granting
organization may enter into an agreement pursuant to this section
and open an education savings account for the child. The
agreement must provide that:
(a) The child will receive instruction in this State for the
school year in at least the subjects of reading, language,
mathematics, science and social studies;
(b) The parent will not use any money in the education savings
account, except as authorized pursuant to section 19 or 20 of this
act;
(c) The child will not be enrolled in any public school while an
education service provider is receiving money from the education
savings account of the child;
(d) The parent will not obtain another educational savings
account for the child from another account-granting
organization; and
(e) The parent will comply with any applicable statute or
regulation relating to education savings accounts.
2. To the extent that money is available to make a grant to an
education savings account pursuant to section 17 of this act, if an
agreement is entered into pursuant to subsection 1, an education
savings account must be established by the account-granting
organization on behalf of the child.
3. To the extent that money is available to make an additional
grant to an education savings account pursuant to section 17 of
this act, the parent and the account-granting organization may
renew an agreement for each school year.
4. The account-granting organization may terminate the
agreement with the parent for an education savings account if the
parent intentionally and substantially misuses money in an
education savings account. The Department shall adopt
regulations setting forth the procedures for determining whether a
parent has intentionally and substantially misused money in an
education savings account.
5. Nothing in this section requires a parent to enroll a child
who receives an education savings account into a private school or
program of distance education. If a parent enters into an
agreement with an account-granting organization pursuant to this
section, the child is excused from compulsory enrollment and
attendance pursuant to NRS 392.070.
Sec. 17. 1. If a parent enters into or renews an agreement
pursuant to section 16 of this act, the account-granting
organization shall deposit in the education savings account
established by the account-granting organization an amount that
is equal to the base per pupil funding plus any weighted funding
-
*SB252*

– 7 –
that the child would be entitled to if the child were enrolled in a
public school.
2. If a parent enrolls a child in a public school during any
school year for which the child received a grant of money in an
education savings account:
(a) The parent must immediately inform the account-granting
organization; and
(b) The account-granting organization shall immediately
freeze the education savings account.
Sec. 18. 1. Each account-granting organization shall
establish a process for approving an education service provider to
receive money from an education savings account. If an account-
granting organization approves an education service provider:
(a) The account-granting organization shall inform the
Department of such approval; and
(b) The education service provider is eligible to receive money
from an education savings account only to pay an expense that is
authorized pursuant to section 19 or 20 of this act.
2. Except as otherwise provided in sections 2 to 26, inclusive,
of this act, approval as an education service provider must not
limit the independence or autonomy of an education service
provider and does not make the actions of an education service
provider the actions of the State Government.
3. An account-granting organization shall revoke approval of
an education service provider to receive money from an education
savings account if the education service provider:
(a) Intentionally and substantially misrepresents information
to a parent;
(b) Routinely fails to provide a child with the service for which
the education service provider received money from an education
savings account; or
(c) Violates any applicable regulation adopted by the
Department.
4. An education service provider has no right to appeal the
decision of an account-granting organization to revoke the
approval of the education service provider to receive money from
an education savings account.
Sec. 19. 1. Money deposited in a child’s education savings
account pursuant to section 17 of this act must be used only to pay
an education service provider for:
(a) Tuition and fees;
(b) Uniforms;
(c) Textbooks and other instructional materials;
(d) Computer hardware or software;
(e) Tutoring or other teaching services;
-
*SB252*

– 8 –
(f) Tuition and fees for a program of distance education;
(g) Fees for any national norm-referenced achievement
examination, advanced placement or similar examination or
standardized examination required for admission to a college or
university;
(h) Transportation required for the child to travel to and from
a private school;
(i) Fees for any extracurricular activity that the child
participates in at a public school or private school;
(j) Educational services or therapies, including, without
limitation, any occupational, behavioral, physical, speech-
language or audiology therapy;
(k) Before- or after-school activities and summer school, but
not including after-school childcare; and
(l) Any other educational expense approved by the account-
granting organization.
2. An education service provider, private school or other
entity that receives a payment authorized pursuant to subsection 1
shall not:
(a) Refund any portion of the payment to the parent who
authorized the payment unless the refund is for an item that is
being returned or an item or service that has not been provided; or
(b) Rebate or otherwise share any portion of the payment with
the parent who authorized the payment.
3. A parent who receives a refund pursuant to subsection 2
shall deposit the refund in the education savings account from
which the money refunded was paid.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a parent
shall not deposit any money into an education savings account.
5. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit a parent
or child from making a payment for any tuition, fee, service or
product described in subsection 1 from a source other than the
education savings account of the child.
Sec. 20. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 19 of this
act, any unused money in an education savings account may be
used by the child to pay for any postsecondary education within 4
years after graduating high school. Any unused money in an
education savings account must be reverted to the account-
granting organization upon the earlier of:
1. The parent enrolling the child in a public school;
2. The child graduating from any postsecondary educational
institution; or
3. The child reaching 26 years of age.
Sec. 21. 1. An account-granting organization must apply
annually for the renewal of certification to participate in the
-
*SB252*

– 9 –
Program. An application for renewal must include, without
limitation:
(a) A copy of the account-granting organization’s Internal
Revenue Service Form 990;
(b) A copy of any audit that is required by the Department; and
(c) An annual report that includes, without limitation:
(1) The number of applications that the account-granting
organization received for education savings accounts pursuant to
section 16 of this act during the immediately preceding school
year, by county and grade level;
(2) The names and addresses of all children who received
money in their education savings accounts during the immediately
preceding school year;
(3) The total number of education savings accounts that the
account-granting organization maintains;
(4) The amounts of money that the account-granting
organization received and distributed during the immediately
preceding fiscal year;
(5) The amount of money retained and spent by the
account-granting organization as administrative costs during the
immediately preceding fiscal year;
(6) The amount of money spent on fees to private financial
institutions to manage or administer education savings accounts;
(7) A list of education service providers approved by the
account-granting organization; and
(8) An attestation that the account-granting organization
complied with all applicable requirements set forth in sections 2 to
26, inclusive, of this act, and any regulations adopted by the
Department pursuant thereto.
2. The annual report required by subsection 1 must:
(a) Comply with uniform accounting standards established by
the Department;
(b) Be certified as accurate by a certified public accountant;
and
(c) Be free of material misstatements or errors.
3. The Department shall process an application for the
renewal of certification within 30 days after receipt.
Sec. 22. The Department shall maintain on its Internet
website a list of account-granting organizations to which a parent
may apply for an education savings account pursuant to the
Program.
Sec. 23. 1. The Department may audit or investigate any
account-granting organization to ensure compliance with the
provisions of sections 2 to 26, inclusive, of this act and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
-
*SB252*

– 10 –
2. If the Department finds that any account-granting
organization has violated any applicable provision of sections 2 to
26, inclusive, of this act, the Department may, after notice and a
hearing, revoke the certification of the account-granting
organization.
Sec. 24. 1. Each account-granting organization shall
submit an annual report of its activities to the Department, in the
form and by the deadline prescribed by the Department.
2. The Department shall prepare and publish on its Internet
website a summary of all annual reports received from account-
granting organizations. The Department shall not include any
identifying information about any parent or child who receives an
education savings account.
Sec. 25. No obligation or liability may be incurred by the
Department, a school district or any public school in this State by
the provisions of sections 2 to 26, inclusive, of this act, including,
without limitation, for any misconduct by an account-granting
organization or an education service provider.
Sec. 26. The Department shall adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the Program.
Sec. 27. NRS 392.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
392.070 Enrollment and attendance of a child required by the
provisions of NRS 392.040 must be excused when:
1. The child is enrolled in a private school pursuant to chapter
394 of NRS; [or]
2. A parent of the child chooses to provide education to the
child and files a notice of intent to homeschool the child with the
superintendent of schools of the school district in which the child
resides in accordance with NRS 388D.020 [.] ; or
3. The parent of the child and an account-granting
organization have entered into an agreement for the establishment
of an education savings account for the child pursuant to section
16 of this act.
Sec. 28. Chapter 363A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay the tax imposed
pursuant to NRS 363A.130 may receive a credit against the tax
otherwise due for any donation of money made by the taxpayer to
an account-granting organization in the manner provided by this
section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to an account-granting
organization must, before making such a donation, notify the
account-granting organization of the taxpayer’s intent to make the
donation and to seek the credit authorized by subsection 1. An
-
*SB252*

– 11 –
account-granting organization shall, before accepting any such
donation, apply to the Department of Taxation for approval of the
credit authorized by subsection 1 for the donation. The
Department of Taxation shall, within 20 days after receiving the
application, approve or deny the application and provide to
the account-granting organization notice of the decision and, if
the application is approved, the amount of the credit authorized.
Upon receipt of notice that the application has been approved, the
account-granting organization shall provide notice of the approval
to the taxpayer who must, not later than 30 days after receiving
the notice, make the donation of money to the account-granting
organization. If the taxpayer does not make the donation of money
to the account-granting organization within 30 days after
receiving the notice, the account-granting organization shall
provide notice of the failure to the Department of Taxation and
the taxpayer forfeits any claim to the credit authorized by
subsection 1.
3. The Department of Taxation shall approve or deny
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 in the order
in which the applications are received.
4. The Department of Taxation may, for each fiscal year,
approve applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 until
the total amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and
approved by the Department of Taxation pursuant to this
subsection and subsection 4 of section 30 of this act is $6,655,000.
The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant to subsection
2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of credits
authorized for any fiscal year.
5. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Department
of Taxation for the credit authorized by subsection 1, the amount
of the credit provided by this section is equal to the amount
approved by the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 2,
which must not exceed the amount of the donation made by the
taxpayer to an account-granting organization. The total amount of
the credit applied against the taxes described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer must not exceed the amount of the
donation.
6. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may,
after applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due,
carry the balance of the credit forward for not more than 3 years
after the end of the calendar year in which the donation is made
or until the balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
-
*SB252*

– 12 –
7. As used in this section, “account-granting organization”
has the meaning ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 29. NRS 363A.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363A.130 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.203,
there is hereby imposed an excise tax on each employer at the rate
of 2 percent of the wages, as defined in NRS 612.190, paid by the
employer during a calendar quarter with respect to employment in
connection with the business activities of the employer.
2. The tax imposed by this section:
(a) Does not apply to any person or other entity or any wages
this State is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution, laws or
treaties of the United States or the Nevada Constitution.
(b) Must not be deducted, in whole or in part, from any wages of
persons in the employment of the employer.
3. Each employer shall, on or before the last day of the month
immediately following each calendar quarter for which the
employer is required to pay a contribution pursuant to
NRS 612.535:
(a) File with the Department a return on a form prescribed by
the Department; and
(b) Remit to the Department any tax due pursuant to this section
for that calendar quarter.
4. In determining the amount of the tax due pursuant to this
section, an employer is entitled to subtract from the amount
calculated pursuant to subsection 1 a credit in an amount equal to 50
percent of the amount of the commerce tax paid by the employer
pursuant to chapter 363C of NRS for the preceding taxable year.
The credit may only be used for any of the 4 calendar quarters
immediately following the end of the taxable year for which the
commerce tax was paid. The amount of credit used for a calendar
quarter may not exceed the amount calculated pursuant to
subsection 1 for that calendar quarter. Any unused credit may not be
carried forward beyond the fourth calendar quarter immediately
following the end of the taxable year for which the commerce tax
was paid, and a taxpayer is not entitled to a refund of any unused
credit.
5. An employer who makes a donation of money to a
scholarship organization during the calendar quarter for which a
return is filed pursuant to this section is entitled, in accordance with
NRS 363A.139, to a credit equal to the amount authorized pursuant
to NRS 363A.139 against any tax otherwise due pursuant to this
section. As used in this subsection, “scholarship organization” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
6. An employer who makes a donation of money to an
account-granting organization during the calendar quarter for
-
*SB252*

– 13 –
which a return is filed pursuant to this section is entitled, in
accordance with section 28 of this act, to a credit equal to the
amount authorized pursuant to section 28 of this act against any
tax otherwise due pursuant to this section. As used in this
subsection, “account-granting organization” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 30. Chapter 363B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay the tax imposed
pursuant to NRS 363B.110 may receive a credit against the tax
otherwise due for any donation of money made by the taxpayer to
an account-granting organization in the manner provided by this
section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to an account-granting
organization must, before making such a donation, notify the
account-granting organization of the taxpayer’s intent to make the
donation and to seek the credit authorized by subsection 1. An
account-granting organizations shall, before accepting any such
donation, apply to the Department of Taxation for approval of the
credit authorized by subsection 1 for the donation. The
Department of Taxation shall, within 20 days after receiving the
application, approve or deny the application and provide to
the account-granting organization notice of the decision and, if
the application is approved, the amount of the credit authorized.
Upon receipt of notice that the application has been approved, the
account-granting organization shall provide notice of the approval
to the taxpayer who must, not later than 30 days after receiving
the notice, make the donation of money to the account-granting
organization. If the taxpayer does not make the donation of money
to the account-granting organization within 30 days after
receiving the notice, the account-granting organization shall
provide notice of the failure to the Department of Taxation and
the taxpayer forfeits any claim to the credit authorized by
subsection 1.
3. The Department of Taxation shall approve or deny
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 in the order
in which the applications are received.
4. The Department of Taxation may, for each fiscal year,
approve applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 until
the total amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and
approved by the Department of Taxation pursuant to this
subsection and subsection 4 of section 28 of this act is $6,655,000.
The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant to
-
*SB252*

– 14 –
subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized for any fiscal year.
5. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Department
of Taxation for the credit authorized by subsection 1, the amount
of the credit provided by this section is equal to the amount
approved by the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 2,
which must not exceed the amount of the donation made by the
taxpayer to an account-granting organization. The total amount of
the credit applied against the taxes described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer must not exceed the amount of the
donation.
6. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may,
after applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due,
carry the balance of the credit forward for not more than 3 years
after the end of the calendar year in which the donation is made
or until the balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
7. As used in this section, “account-granting organization”
has the meaning ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 31. NRS 363B.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363B.110 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.203,
there is hereby imposed an excise tax on each employer at the rate
of 1.475 percent of the amount by which the sum of all the wages,
as defined in NRS 612.190, paid by the employer during a calendar
quarter with respect to employment in connection with the business
activities of the employer exceeds $50,000.
2. The tax imposed by this section:
(a) Does not apply to any person or other entity or any wages
this State is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution, laws or
treaties of the United States or the Nevada Constitution.
(b) Must not be deducted, in whole or in part, from any wages of
persons in the employment of the employer.
3. Each employer shall, on or before the last day of the month
immediately following each calendar quarter for which the
employer is required to pay a contribution pursuant to
NRS 612.535:
(a) File with the Department a return on a form prescribed by
the Department; and
(b) Remit to the Department any tax due pursuant to this chapter
for that calendar quarter.
4. In determining the amount of the tax due pursuant to this
section, an employer is entitled to subtract from the amount
calculated pursuant to subsection 1 a credit in an amount equal to 50
percent of the amount of the commerce tax paid by the employer
-
*SB252*

– 15 –
pursuant to chapter 363C of NRS for the preceding taxable year.
The credit may only be used for any of the 4 calendar quarters
immediately following the end of the taxable year for which the
commerce tax was paid. The amount of credit used for a calendar
quarter may not exceed the amount calculated pursuant to
subsection 1 for that calendar quarter. Any unused credit may not be
carried forward beyond the fourth calendar quarter immediately
following the end of the taxable year for which the commerce tax
was paid, and a taxpayer is not entitled to a refund of any unused
credit.
5. An employer who makes a donation of money to a
scholarship organization during the calendar quarter for which a
return is filed pursuant to this section is entitled, in accordance with
NRS 363B.119, to a credit equal to the amount authorized pursuant
to NRS 363B.119 against any tax otherwise due pursuant to this
section. As used in this subsection, “scholarship organization” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
6. An employer who makes a donation of money to an
account-granting organization during the calendar quarter for
which a return is filed pursuant to this section is entitled, in
accordance with section 30 of this act, to a credit equal to the
amount authorized pursuant to section 30 of this act against any
tax otherwise due pursuant to this section. As used in this
subsection, “account-granting organization” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 32. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 31, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB252*